Idaho, session 2026, H0578.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 22, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-2208, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-2208. LEGISLATIVE APPROVAL -- INCARCERATED JUVENILES TRANSITION
SERVICES. (1) Pursuant to section 1902 of the social security act, the de-
partment of health and welfare is authorized to seek and shall submit a state
plan amendment by July 1, 2026, that makes the services authorized in this
section available for eligible juveniles who are within thirty (30) days of
the date they are scheduled to be released from a correctional facility, as
that term is defined by section 18-101A, Idaho Code, following adjudication.
Services for eligible juveniles shall include:
(a) Any screening or diagnostic service that meets reasonable stan-
dards of medical, behavioral health, or dental practices, as determined
by the state, or as indicated as medically necessary; and
(b) Targeted case management services, including referrals for appro-
priate care and services available in the geographic region of the home
or residence of such eligible juvenile, where feasible, under the state
plan or waiver of such plan.
(2) This section shall not be construed to authorize services beyond
those that are required by section 1902 of the social security act for eligi-
ble juveniles on or before July 1, 2026.
(3) The services included in any state plan submitted pursuant to this
section shall not commence before July 1, 2027, and are subject to legisla-
tive appropriation.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.